Utah statutes.
76-7-305.7.   Statistical report by the Department of Health.

(1)  In accordance with Subsection (2), the Department of Health shall, on an annual basis, after December 31 of each year, compile and report the following information, relating to the preceding calendar year, to the Health and Human Services Interim Committee:

(a)  the total number of abortions that were performed in the state;

(b)  the reported reasons, if any, the women sought the abortions described in Subjection (1)(a);

(c)  the stage of pregnancy in which the abortions described in Subsection (1)(a) were performed, including:

(i)  the trimester; and

(ii)  estimated week of pregnancy;

(d)  the races and ethnicities of the women who obtained the abortions described in Subsection (1)(a), including:

(i)  Alaska Native;

(ii)  American Indian;

(iii)  Asian;

(iv)  Black or African American;

(v)  Hispanic or Latino;

(vi)  Native Hawaiian or Pacific Islander;

(vii)  White, not Hispanic or Latino; and

(viii)  some other race;

(e)  the total amount of informed consent material described in this section that was distributed or accessed;

(f)  the number of women who obtained abortions in this state without receiving the informed consent materials described in this section;

(g)  the number of statements signed by attending physicians under Subsection 76-7-305.6(4); and

(h)  any other information pertaining to obtaining informed consent from a woman who seeks an abortion.

(2)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall be prepared and presented in a manner that preserves physician and patient anonymity.



Amended by Chapter 61, 2013 General Session

